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DI−248 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1241 / 41 IGPowerSourceCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1241 / 41

Detection of any of conditions 1. through 4.:
1. Vehicle speed is 3 km/h (1.9 mph) or more and voltage

of ECU terminal IG remains at below 9.5 V for more than
10 sec.

2. While the condition that the solenoid relay is ON contin-
ues, ECU terminal IG1 voltage becomes 9.5 V or less,
and the condition that the contact point of the solenoid
relay is OFF continues for 0.2 sec. or more.

3. The condition that ECU terminal IG1 voltage is more
than 17.0 V continues for 1.2 sec. or more.

4. While the solenoid relay outputs ON signal, ECU termi-
nal IG1 voltage becomes more than 17.0 V, and the
condition that the contact point of the solenoid relay is
OFF continues for 0.2 sec. or more.

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbatteryvoltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK

2 Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thevoltageconditionoutput fromtheECUdisplayedon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.
Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:

PREPARATION:
Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals IG1 and GND of skid

control ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
skid control ECU.

NG
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

3 Check continuity between terminal GND of skid control ECU connector and body
ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal GND of skid control ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 � or less

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Check ECU−IG fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove ECU−IG fuse from cowl side J/B LH.
CHECK:
Check continuity of ECU−IG fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
components connected to ECU−IG fuse (See at-
tached wiring diagram).

OK

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between skid control ECU and battery (See page
IN−38).


